third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fo_FO/fo_FO.aff
FLAG num
#táliður
SFX 945 N 16
SFX 945 0 a .
SFX 945 0 anna .
SFX 945 0 ar .
SFX 945 0 arins .
SFX 945 0 i .
SFX 945 0 in .
SFX 945 0 inum .
SFX 945 0 ir .
SFX 945 0 irnar .
SFX 945 0 irnir .
SFX 945 0 s .
SFX 945 0 sins .
SFX 945 0 um .
SFX 945 0 unum .
SFX 945 0 ur .
SFX 945 0 urin .

#ær
SFX 946 N 1
SFX 946 m num .

#býttlingi
SFX 947 N 12
SFX 947 0 linga .
SFX 947 0 lingan .
SFX 947 0 linganna .
SFX 947 0 lingans .
SFX 947 0 linganum .
SFX 947 0 lingar .
SFX 947 0 lingarnar .
SFX 947 0 lingarnir .
SFX 947 0 lingi .
SFX 947 0 lingin .
SFX 947 0 lingum .
SFX 947 0 lingunum .

#veva
SFX 948 N 6
SFX 948 0 a .
SFX 948 0 að .
SFX 948 0 aði .
SFX 948 0 aðu .
SFX 948 0 ar .
SFX 948 0 ur .

#Koltur
SFX 949 N 3
SFX 949 0 ri .
SFX 949 0 ur .
SFX 949 0 urs .

#islamskur
SFX 950 N 9
SFX 950 0 sk .
SFX 950 0 ska .
SFX 950 0 skan .
SFX 950 0 skar .
SFX 950 0 skari .
SFX 950 0 skir .
SFX 950 0 skt .
SFX 950 0 skum .
SFX 950 0 skur .

#jólasummar
SFX 951 N 8
SFX 951 0 ar .
SFX 951 0 arið .
SFX 951 0 ars .
SFX 951 0 arsins .
SFX 951 0 ør .
SFX 951 0 ørini .
SFX 951 0 ur .
SFX 951 0 urini .

#maktgreði
SFX 952 N 8
SFX 952 j 0 .
SFX 952 j ar .
SFX 952 j arinnar .
SFX 952 j in .
SFX 952 j ina .
SFX 952 j ini .
SFX 952 0 ar .
SFX 952 0 arinnar .

#akkeri
SFX 953 N 9
SFX 953 i a .
SFX 953 i anna .
SFX 953 i ið .
SFX 953 i um .
SFX 953 i unum .
SFX 953 0 ni .
SFX 953 0 num .
SFX 953 0 s .
SFX 953 0 sins .

#tjúkka
SFX 954 N 5
SFX 954 k t .
SFX 954 k ti .
SFX 954 k tu .
SFX 954 0 a .
SFX 954 0 ir .
