third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/fo_FO/fo_FO.dic
akkeri/953
býtt/58,12,947,164,60,9,164
islam/1,477,466,950
jólasumm/1,951
Kolt/1,949
maktgreðij/1,952
óm/946
tálið/59,945
tjúkk/954,4,433,12,280,480,104
vev/948,23,86,164,327,20,209,150,173,89,305,28
